Washington statutes.
RCW 2.53.045

Fund distribution for attorneys appointed in dependency proceedings.

(1) Money appropriated by the legislature for legal services provided by an attorney appointed pursuant to RCW 13.34.212 must be administered by the office of civil legal aid established under RCW 2.53.020.

(2) The statewide children's legal representation program shall enter into contracts with attorneys and agencies for the provision of legal services under RCW 2.53.025 to remain within appropriated amounts.

(3) Prior to distributing state funds under subsection (2) of this section, the statewide children's legal representation program must verify that attorneys providing legal representation to children under RCW 13.34.212 meet the standards of practice, caseload limits, and training guidelines adopted by the children's representation work group established in section 9, chapter 210, Laws of 2021.

[ 2021 c 210 s 7; 2018 c 21 s 3; 2014 c 108 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 210: See note following RCW 13.34.090.

Finding—Construction—Effective date—2014 c 108: See notes following RCW 13.34.100.